Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4150.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 Sec. 1531h. (1) Not later than July 1, 2010, the department shall establish and implement a teacher certification database system that provides for at least all of the following: (a) The ability for teachers to renew a professional teaching certificate online. (b) Online credit card payment capability, to result in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 processing of teaching certificate applications and issuance of teaching certificates within 48 to 72 hours for in-state applicants and within 3 weeks for out-of-state applicants who have provided a complete application, as determined by the department. (c) A central registry that documents each teacher's professional development activities and completion of state board continuing education units. (d) Improved compatibility with the registry of educational personnel data reporting system. (e) Improved efficiency of the teacher preparation institution web-based teacher certification recommendation process. (f) Improved capacity to generate reports about the number of certificates and endorsements issued. (g) Improved quality control through customization of the system. (2) The Before the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 1538(3), the department shall fund the system required under subsection (1) from the fee increases in section 1538 that result from the amendatory act that added this section.2007 PA 144. Sec. 1538. (1) An Before the effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (3), an applicant shall pay the following fees to the department for having the application evaluated for conformance with the application requirements: (a) Original application fee In-State Applicant Out-of-State Applicant (i) Provisional Standard teaching certificate..................... $160.00 $210.00 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (ii) Professional teaching certificate..................... 160.00 210.00 (iii) Vocational temporary authorization or interim occupational certificate........ 160.00 210.00 (iv) Occupational education certificate..................... 160.00 210.00 (v) Additional teaching certificate endorsement..................... 50.00 (vi) Substitute teacher permit....... 45.00 (vii) Full-year teacher permit........ 45.00 (viii) Emergency permit................ 45.00 (ix) Annual occupational authorization................... 40.00 (x) Duplicate certificate or authorization................... 25.00 (xi) School psychologist certificate..................... 160.00 210.00 (xii) Temporary special education approval........................ 50.00 (xiii) School administrator certificate for persons eligible for certificate after July 1, 1988... 160.00 210.00 (xiv) School administrator endorsement..................... 50.00 (xv) School counselor license........ 160.00 210.00 (b) Renewal or reinstatement application fee In-State Applicant 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Provisional Standard teaching certificate............ $100.00 (ii) Continuing teaching certificate reinstatement............................... 50.00 (iii) Professional teaching certificate........... 160.00 (iv) Vocational temporary authorization or interim occupational certificate............ 100.00 (v) Occupational education certificate.......... 160.00 (vi) School psychologist certificate............. 160.00 (vii) School administrator certificate............ 160.00 (viii) School counselor license.................... 160.00 (2) Except as otherwise provided by an administrative rule in effect on October 1, 1988, or as otherwise provided by law, a certificate, permit, authorization, endorsement, or approval, and the renewal of a certificate, certificate reinstatement, or authorization issued pursuant to under subsection (1) is valid for 5 years. (3) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, an applicant is not required to pay a fee to the department for having an initial application for a certificate, license, approval, endorsement, authorization, or permit listed under subsection (1) evaluated for conformance with application requirements or for having an application for the renewal or reinstatement of a certificate, license, approval, endorsement, authorization, or permit listed under subsection (1) evaluated for conformance with application requirements. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall not charge a fee for the submission of an application described in this subsection, for an evaluation of an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 application as described in this subsection, or for the issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of a certificate, license, approval, endorsement, authorization, or permit listed under subsection (1). Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall cover the cost of a fee described under subsection (1) that would have been collected by the department before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection for the evaluation of an application as described in this subsection.